Utah statutes.
41-6a-302.   Placing and maintenance on state highways -- Restrictions on local authorities.

In accordance with Section 72-3-109, a highway authority shall place and maintain traffic-control devices:

(1)  in conformance with the standards and specifications adopted under Section 41-6a-301 on all highways under the highway authority's jurisdiction; and

(2)  as the highway authority finds necessary to:

(a)  carry out the provisions of:

(i)  this chapter; or

(ii)  a local traffic ordinance if the highway authority is a local highway authority; or

(b)   regulate, warn, or guide traffic.

